Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB162.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 12531(a) of Title 11 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 12531. Tax levies.(a) Property tax.--Council may, by resolution for taxes levied at the same rate as or a rate lower than the previous fiscal year, and by ordinance if the tax rate increases from the previous fiscal year, levy and, in accordance with this part, provide for the collection of taxes on all property within the city that is made taxable for city purposes and subject to valuation and assessment by the county assessment office or the city, as provided in Subchapter A (relating to assessments of property for taxation), as follows:* * *1234567891011121314151617 (6) An annual tax not exceeding one-half mill to support ambulance, rescue and other emergency services serving the city. The following apply:(i) The council may appropriate up to one-half of the revenue generated from a tax under this paragraph for the purpose of paying salaries, benefits or other compensation of employees of the ambulance, rescue or other emergency service. FOR ANY CALENDAR YEAR, THE COUNCIL MAY WAIVE THE APPROPRIATION LIMITATION UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH BY RESOLUTION.(ii) If an annual tax is proposed to be set higher than one-half mill, the question shall be submitted to the voters of the city. When the assent of the electors is required under this subparagraph, the county board of elections shall frame the question under the election laws of this Commonwealth for submission to the voters of the city at the first municipal or general election occurring not less than 60 days after submission of the question.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0162PN0477 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021